Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 2. ESTATES OF DECEDENTS; DURABLE POWERS OF ATTORNEY

SUBTITLE C. PASSAGE OF TITLE AND DISTRIBUTION OF DECEDENTS' PROPERTY IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 101. ESTATE ASSETS IN GENERAL

SUBCHAPTER A. PASSAGE AND POSSESSION OF DECEDENT'S ESTATE ON DEATH

Sec. 101.001. PASSAGE OF ESTATE ON DECEDENT'S DEATH. (a) Subject to Section 101.051, if a person dies leaving a lawful will:

(1) all of the person's estate that is devised by the will vests immediately in the devisees;

(2) all powers of appointment granted in the will vest immediately in the donees of those powers; and

(3) all of the person's estate that is not devised by the will vests immediately in the person's heirs at law.

(b) Subject to Section 101.051, the estate of a person who dies intestate vests immediately in the person's heirs at law.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 101.002. EFFECT OF JOINT OWNERSHIP OF PROPERTY. If two or more persons hold an interest in property jointly and one joint owner dies before severance, the interest of the decedent in the joint estate:

(1) does not survive to the remaining joint owner or owners; and

(2) passes by will or intestacy from the decedent as if the decedent's interest had been severed.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 101.003. POSSESSION OF ESTATE BY PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE. On the issuance of letters testamentary or of administration on an estate described by Section 101.001, the executor or administrator has the right to possession of the estate as the estate existed at the death of the testator or intestate, subject to the exceptions provided by Section 101.051. The executor or administrator shall recover possession of the estate and hold the estate in trust to be disposed of in accordance with the law.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER B. LIABILITY OF ESTATE FOR DEBTS

Sec. 101.051. LIABILITY OF ESTATE FOR DEBTS IN GENERAL. (a) A decedent's estate vests in accordance with Section 101.001(a) subject to the payment of:

(1) the debts of the decedent, except as exempted by law; and

(2) any court-ordered child support payments that are delinquent on the date of the decedent's death.

(b) A decedent's estate vests in accordance with Section 101.001(b) subject to the payment of, and is still liable for:

(1) the debts of the decedent, except as exempted by law; and

(2) any court-ordered child support payments that are delinquent on the date of the decedent's death.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 101.052. LIABILITY OF COMMUNITY PROPERTY FOR DEBTS. (a) The community property that was by law under the sole management, control, and disposition of a spouse or under the joint management, control, and disposition of the spouses during marriage continues to be subject to the liabilities of that spouse on the death of either spouse.

(a-1) The undivided one-half interest that the surviving spouse owned in community property that was by law under the sole management, control, and disposition of the deceased spouse during marriage is subject to the liabilities of the surviving spouse on the death of the deceased spouse.

(b) The undivided one-half interest that the deceased spouse owned in community property that was by law under the sole management, control, and disposition of the surviving spouse during marriage passes to the deceased spouse's heirs or devisees charged with the liabilities of the deceased spouse.

(c) This section does not prohibit the administration of community property under other provisions of this title relating to the administration of an estate.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 205 (S.B. 1373), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 205 (S.B. 1373), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2023.